North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36C. North Carolina Uniform Trust Code.
Article 11. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 36C-11-1101.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Chapter, consideration may be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2005-192, s. 2.

Effective Date and Applicability.

Session Laws 2005-192, which enacted Chapter 36C, in s. 7(a) provides: “Section 2 of this act becomes effective January 1, 2006, and except as otherwise provided in Chapter 36C of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section
2 of this act, applies to (i) all trusts created before, on, or after that date; (ii) all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after that date; and (iii) judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before that date unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of Chapter 36C of the General Statutes would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of Chapter 36C of the General Statutes does not apply and the superseded law applies.

“Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 36C of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section 2 of this act, any rule of construction or presumption provided in Chapter 36C of the General Statutes applies to trust instruments executed before the effective date of Section 2 of this act unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust or unless application of that rule of construction or presumption would impair substantial rights of a beneficiary. Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 36C of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section 2 of this act, an act done before the effective date of Section 2 of this act is not affected by Chapter 36C of the General Statutes. If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before the effective date of Section 2 of this act, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.”

The Uniform Trust Code is intended to have the widest possible effect within constitutional limitations.
Specifically, the Code applies to all trusts whenever created, to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after its effective date, and unless the court otherwise orders, to judicial proceedings in progress on the effective date.
In addition, any rules of construction or presumption provided in the Code apply to preexisting trusts unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the trust’s terms.
By applying the Code to preexisting trusts, the need to know two bodies of law will quickly lessen.

This Code cannot be fully retroactive, however. Constitutional limitations preclude retroactive application of rules of construction to alter property rights under trusts that became irrevocable prior to the effective date.
Also, rights already barred by a statute of limitation or rule under former law are not revived by a possibly longer statute or more liberal rule under this Code.
Nor is an act done before the effective date of the Code affected by the Code’s enactment.

The Uniform Trust Code contains an additional effective date provision.
Pursuant to Section 602(a), prior law will determine whether a trust executed prior to the effective date of the Code is presumed to be revocable or irrevocable.

For a comparable uniform law effective date provision, see Uniform Probate Code Section 8 101.

The drafters modified the provisions of the Uniform Trust Code relating to its application to trust instruments executed before its effective date by adding the phrase “or unless application of that rule of construction or presumption would impair substantial rights of a beneficiary” to the end of the first sentence of the second paragraph.
Although this Chapter is intended to have broad application, the drafters concluded that a rule of construction or presumption provided in this Chapter should not be applied to a trust instrument executed before the effective date of this Chapter if the application of such rule or presumption would impair the substantial rights of a beneficiary of a trust established under such a trust instrument.

§ 36C-11-1102.
Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this Chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of those records or signatures, conform to the requirements of section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7002) and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

History.

2005-192, s. 2.

§ 36C-11-1103.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this Chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this Chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Chapter are severable.

History.

2005-192, s. 2.

§ 36C-11-1104.
Trustee signatures.

The signature of a trustee of a trust who signs a document for or on behalf of the trust shall be deemed to be the signature of the trustee as such. A document which identifies a trust shall be deemed to include the trustee or the trustees as such.

History.

2007-106, s. 54.

North Carolina Comment (2007)

Effective October 1, 2007, this section, which is not a part of the Uniform Trust Code, provides a rule of construction that the signature of a trustee who signs a document on behalf of a trust shall be deemed to be the signature of the trustee and that a document identifying a trust shall be deemed to include the trustee as such.
This section coordinates with

G.S. 39-6.7

, also effective October 1, 2007, construing conveyances that purport to be to or by a trust to be conveyances to or by the trustees of that trust.
The drafters thought that these provisions were necessary because, although trustees have legal title to the trust assets, sometimes documents are executed in the name of the trust itself as a party or refer to the trust itself rather than to the trustee.

§ 36C-11-1105.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Comment

For the reasons why the above Uniform Acts should be repealed upon enactment of the Uniform Trust Code, see the Prefatory Note. Enacting jurisdictions that have not enacted one or more of the specified Uniform Acts should repeal their comparable legislation. Because of the comprehensive scope of the Uniform Trust Code, many States will have trust provisions not based on any Uniform Act that will need to be repealed upon enactment of this Code. This section does not attempt to list the types of conforming amendments, whether in the enacting State’s probate code or elsewhere, that need to be made upon enactment of this Code.

§ 36C-11-1106.
Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, this Chapter applies to (i) all trusts created before, on, or after January 1, 2006; (ii) all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after January 1, 2006; and (iii) judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before January 1, 2006, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of this Chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of this Chapter does not apply and the superseded law applies.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, any rule of construction or presumption provided in this Chapter applies to trust instruments executed before January 1, 2006, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust or unless application of that rule of construction or presumption would impair substantial rights of a beneficiary. Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, an act done before January 1, 2006, is not affected by this Chapter. If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before January 1, 2006, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

History.

2005-192, ss. 7(a), (b); 2006-226, ss. 31(a), (b).

Official Comment on Effective Date and Applicability.

The Uniform Trust Code is intended to have the widest possible effect within constitutional limitations. Specifically, the Code applies to all trusts whenever created, to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after its effective date, and unless the court otherwise orders, to judicial proceedings in progress on the effective date. In addition, any rules of construction or presumption provided in the Code apply to preexisting trusts unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the trust’s terms. By applying the Code to preexisting trusts, the need to know two bodies of law will quickly lessen.

This Code cannot be fully retroactive, however. Constitutional limitations preclude retroactive application of rules of construction to alter property rights under trusts that became irrevocable prior to the effective date. Also, rights already barred by a statute of limitation or rule under former law are not revived by a possibly longer statute or more liberal rule under this Code. Nor is an act done before the effective date of the Code affected by the Code’s enactment.

The Uniform Trust Code contains an additional effective date provision. Pursuant to Section 602(a), prior law will determine whether a trust executed prior to the effective date of the Code is presumed to be revocable or irrevocable.

For a comparable uniform law effective date provision, see Uniform Probate Code § 8-101.

The drafters modified the provisions of the Uniform Trust Code relating to its application to trust instruments executed before its effective date by adding the phrase “or unless application of that rule of construction or presumption would impair substantial rights of a beneficiary” to the end of the first sentence of the second paragraph. Although this Chapter is intended to have broad application, the drafters concluded that a rule of construction or presumption provided in this Chapter should not be applied to a trust instrument executed before the effective date of this Chapter if the application of such rule or presumption would impair the substantial rights of a beneficiary of a trust established under such a trust instrument.